Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1069.5] Misrepresenting a notarized
document in the second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of
misrepresenting a notarized document in the second degree if, with intent to
mislead another, the person submits or invites reliance on a document that the
person knows has been altered after the document had been notarized by a notary
public in this or any other jurisdiction.

(2) Misrepresenting a notarized document in
the second degree is a misdemeanor. [L 2008, c 175, pt of §3]

COMMENTARY ON §§710-1069 AND 710-1069.5

Act 175, Session Laws 2008, added these sections,
establishing criminal offenses for misrepresenting a notarized document. Act
175 deterred fraud by strengthening the laws relating to notaries and notarized
documents. Conference Committee Report No. 77-08.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next